Hawaii statutes.
§394-9 Eligibility requirements. (a)
In order to be eligible for state-assisted training or retraining under section
394-8, businesses must:

(1) Be licensed to do business in Hawaii;

(2) Establish or expand operations in Hawaii; and

(3) Be engaged in research, development,
manufacturing, production, or delivery of services in growth industries such
as, but not limited to, electronics, software, instrumentation, biotechnology,
renewable energy, telecommunications, computers, mariculture, aquaculture, tropical
agriculture, Hawaiian natural products, and space applications including
astronomical research.

(b) The department may adopt rules to further
clarify qualifying businesses and industries, eligible job positions for
training, and eligible persons for job training to promote economic expansion
within the State and may consult with the department of business, economic
development, and tourism prior to issuing these rules. [L 1987, c 241, §3; am L
1988, c 141, §36; am L 1990, c 293, §8]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next